Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-1134
Reports.

(1) The department in collaboration
with the Advisory Committee on Developmental Disabilities established under
section 83-1212.01 shall submit quarterly reports to the court, all parties
of record, and the guardian of any subject in court-ordered custody.

(2) The department
shall submit electronically an
annual report to the Legislature regarding the implementation of the Developmental
Disabilities Court-Ordered Custody Act. Such reports shall not contain any
name, address, or other identifying factors or other confidential information
regarding any subject.

Laws 2005, LB 206, § 34;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 110.